de: Fahrzeuge & Teile > Fahrzeugersatzteile & -zubehör > Kfz-Elektronik > Lautsprecher für Autos: Koaxiallautsprecher; Komponentenlautsprecher; Breitbandlautsprecher; Mittelton-Lautsprecher; Kalottenlautsprecher; Woofer
pl: Pojazdy i części > Akcesoria i części do pojazdów > Wyposażenie elektroniczne pojazdów silnikowych > Głośniki samochodowe: Głośniki koncentryczne; Głośniki komponentowe; Głośniki pełnozakresowe; Głośniki średniotonowe; Głośniki wysokotonowe; Woofery
da: Køretøjer og dele > Dele og tilbehør til køretøjer > Elektronik til motorkøretøjer > Højttalere til motorkøretøjer: Koaksiale højttalere; Komponenthøjttalere; Højttalere i fuld rækkevidde; Højttalere i mellem rækkevidde; Tweetere; Bashøjttalere
pt-BR: Veículos e peças > Peças e acessórios de veículos > Eletrônicos para veículos motorizados > Alto-falantes para veículos motorizados: Alto-falantes coaxiais; Componentes de alto-falantes; Alto-falantes de faixa completa; Alto-falantes de faixa intermediária; Tweeters; Woofers
it: Veicoli e parti > Componenti e accessori per auto > Elettronica per veicoli a motore > Altoparlanti per veicoli: Altoparlanti coassiali; Altoparlanti componenti; Altoparlanti full-range; Altoparlanti mid-range; Tweeter; Woofer
sv: Fordon och delar > Fordonsdelar och tillbehör > Fordonselektronik > Högtalare till motorfordon: Koaxialhögtalare; Komponenthögtalare; Full-range-högtalare; Mid-range-högtalare; Diskanthögtalare; Bashögtalare
nb: Kjøretøy og deler > Deler og tilbehør til kjøretøy > Kjøretøyelektronikk > Kjøretøyhøyttalere: Koaksiale høyttalere; Komponenthøyttalere; Fulltonehøyttalere; Mellomtonehøyttalere; Diskanthøyttalere; Basshøyttalere
ja: 乗り物・パーツ > 乗り物用パーツ・関連用品 > 車載用電子機器 > 車載用スピーカー: 同軸スピーカー; コンポーネントスピーカー; フルレンジスピーカー; ミッドレンジスピーカー; ツイーター; ウーファー
nl: Voertuigen en onderdelen > Voertuigonderdelen en -accessoires > Elektronica voor motorvoertuigen > Luidsprekers voor motorvoertuigen: Coaxiale luidsprekers; Componentluidsprekers; Luidsprekers met volledig bereik; Luidsprekers met middenbereik; Tweeters; Woofers
ko: 차량/부품 > 차량 부품/부대용품 > 자동차 전자 장치 > 자동차 스피커: 동축 스피커; 컴포넌트 스피커; 풀레인지 스피커; 미드레인지 스피커; 트위터; 우퍼
hu: Járművek és alkatrészek > Járműalkatrészek és -kiegészítők > Gépjármű-elektronika > Gépjárműhangszórók: Koaxiális hangszórók; Komponens hangszórók; Teljes hangszórók; Közepes hangszórók; Magassugárzók; Mélysugárzók
tr: Taşıtlar ve Parçalar > Taşıt Parçaları ve Aksesuarlar > Motorlu Taşıt Elektronik Sistemleri > Motorlu Araç Hoparlörleri: Koaksiyel Hoparlörler; Komponent Hoparlörler; Tam Aralıklı Hoparlörler; Orta Aralıklı Hoparlörler; Tweeter; Woofer
lt-LT: Transporto priemonės ir dalys > Transporto priemonių dalys ir priedai > Motorinių transporto priemonių elektronika > Motorinių transporto priemonių garsiakalbiai: Koaksialiniai garsiakalbiai; Komponentiniai garsiakalbiai; Viso diapazono garsiakalbiai; Vidutinių dažnių garsiakalbiai; Aukštųjų dažnių garsiakalbiai; Žemųjų dažnių garsiakalbiai
en: Vehicles & Parts > Vehicle Parts & Accessories > Motor Vehicle Electronics > Motor Vehicle Speakers: Coaxial Speakers; Component Speakers; Full-Range Speakers; Mid-Range Speakers; Tweeters; Woofers
zh-CN: 交通工具/汽车/飞机/船舶 > 交通工具零件/配件 > 机动车电子产品 > 车载扬声器: 同轴扬声器; 组合音箱; 全频扬声器; 中频扬声器; 高音扬声器; 低音扬声器
fi: Ajoneuvot ja osat > Ajoneuvojen osat ja tarvikkeet > Moottoriajoneuvojen elektroniikka > Moottoriajo­neuvojen kaiuttimet: Koaksiaalikaiuttimet; Komponenttikaiuttimet; Täyden alueen kaiuttimet; Keskialueen kaiuttimet; Diskanttielementit; Bassokaiuttimet
es: Vehículos y recambios > Piezas y accesorios para vehículos > Material electrónico para vehículos motorizados > Altavoces para automóviles: Altavoces coaxiales; Altavoces de componentes; Altavoces de rango completo; Altavoces de gama media; Tweeters; Woofers
fr: Véhicules et accessoires > Pièces détachées pour véhicules > Électronique pour véhicules > Haut-parleurs pour véhicules: Haut-parleurs coaxiaux; Haut-parleurs composants; Haut-parleurs large bande; Haut-parleurs bande moyenne; Tweeters; Woofers
sk-SK: Diely pre vozidlá > Diely a príslušenstvo pre vozidlá > Elektronika motorových vozidiel > Reproduktory do motorových vozidiel: Koaxiálne reproduktory; Komponentné reproduktory; Reproduktory s úplným rozsahom; Reproduktory so stredným rozsahom; Výškové reproduktory; Basové reproduktory
ro-RO: Vehicule și piese > Piese și accesorii pentru vehicule > Componente electronice pentru autovehicule > Difuzoare pentru autovehicule: Difuzoare coaxiale; Difuzoare componente; Difuzoare gamă completă; Difuzoare gamă medie; Difuzoare pentru frecvențe înalte; Difuzoare pentru frecvențe joase
vi: Xe và phụ tùng > Bộ phận và phụ kiện xe cộ > Thiết bị điện tử xe cơ giới > Loa xe cơ giới: Loa đồng trục; Loa component; Loa toàn dải; Loa trung tần; Loa cao tần; Loa trầm
sl-SI: Vozila in deli > Deli in dodatki za vozila > Elektronika za motorna vozila > Zvočniki za motorna vozila: Koaksialni zvočniki; Komponentni zvočniki; Zvočniki polnega razpona; Zvočniki srednjega razpona; Visokotonski zvočniki; Basovski zvočniki
el: Οχήματα & ανταλλακτικά > Ανταλλακτικά & αξεσουάρ οχημάτων > Ηλεκτρονικά μηχανοκίνητων οχημάτων > Ηχεία μηχανοκίνητων οχημάτων: Ομοαξονικά ηχεία; Εξαρτήματα ηχείων; Ηχεία πλήρους εύρους; Ηχεία μεσαίου εύρους; Ηχεία υψηλών συχνοτήτων (τουίτερ); Ηχεία χαμηλών συχνοτήτων (γούφερ)
cs: Vozidla a náhradní díly > Díly a příslušenství vozidel > Elektronika vozidel > Reproduktory do vozidel: Koaxiální reproduktory; Komponentní reproduktory; Celopásmové reproduktory; Středopásmové reproduktory; Tweetery; Woofery
zh-TW: 車輛與零配件 > 車輛零件/配件 > 汽機車電子裝置 > 汽機車喇叭: 同軸揚聲器; 組合揚聲器; 全音揚聲器; 中音揚聲器; 高音揚聲器; 低音揚聲器
pt-PT: Veículos e peças > Acessórios e peças para veículos > Componentes eletrónicos para veículos motorizados > Altifalantes para veículos motorizados: Altifalantes coaxiais; Altifalantes componentes; Altifalantes de alto alcance; Altifalantes de médio alcance; Tweeters; Woofers
ru: Транспортные средства, запчасти и аксессуары > Запчасти и аксессуары для транспортных средств > Автомобильная электроника > Автомобильные динамики: Коаксиальные динамики; Компонентные динамики; Широкополосные динамики; Среднечастотные динамики; Высокочастотные динамики; Низкочастотные динамики
bg-BG: Превозни средства и части > Автомобилни части и аксесоари > Електроника за моторни превозни средства > Говорители за моторни превозни средства: Коаксиални говорители; Компонентни говорители; Говорители с пълен обхват; Средночестотни говорители; Високочестотни говорители; Нискочестотни говорители
th: รถยนต์และชิ้นส่วน > ชิ้นส่วนและอุปกรณ์สำหรับยานยนต์ > วงจรอิเล็กทรอนิกส์ในรถยนต์ > ลำโพงรถยนต์: ลำโพงโคแอกเซียล; ลำโพงแยกชิ้น; ลำโพงเต็มย่านความถี่; ลำโพงย่านความถี่ระดับกลาง; ลำโพงเสียงแหลม; วูฟเฟอร์
hr-HR: Vozila i dijelovi vozila > Dijelovi i oprema za vozila > Elektronika za motorna vozila > Zvučnici za motorna vozila: Koaksijalni zvučnici; Komponentni zvučnici; Zvučnici punog raspona; Zvučnici srednjeg raspona; Zvučnici visokotonci; Wooferi